Utah statutes.
17-36-2.   Purpose of chapter.
The purpose of this act is to codify and revise the law relating to county
fiscal procedures in order to establish uniform accounting, budgeting, and
financial reporting procedures for all counties. The act provides for the
establishment of uniform procedures for the adoption and administration of
fiscal and optional performance budgets.
The act is intended to enable counties to make financial plans for both
current and capital expenditures, to ensure that executive staffs administer
their respective functions in accordance with adopted budgets, and to provide
taxpayers and investors with information about the financial policies and
administration of the county in which they are interested.
